Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 1. Public Service Commission
§ 77-1-43.
Enforcement of laws and orders, decisions and determinations of commission [Repealed effective December 31, 2020].

The commission may apply to the circuit or chancery court, by proper proceeding, for aid in the enforcement of obedience to its process, and to compel compliance with Title 77, Mississippi Code of 1972, and its lawful rules, regulations, orders, decisions, and determinations. Said courts shall have jurisdiction to grant aid and relief in such cases, subject to the right of appeal to the Supreme Court by the party aggrieved. The commission itself may, by order after notice and hearing, institute such proceedings or, at the request of the commission by order after notice and hearing, the Attorney General, or district attorney in his district, shall institute such proceedings in the name of the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4286; 1906, § 4838; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7623; 1930, § 7040; 1942, §§ 7701, 7817; Laws, 1938, ch. 139; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 389, § 22; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1990, ch. 530, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 1993, ch. 616, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 1996, ch. 526, § 19; reenacted without change, 1998, ch. 303, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 452, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 386, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, ch. 406, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 456, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 542, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 332, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 437, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2016; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2018, ch. 402, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 77-1-45.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1992, ch. 356, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

[Codes, 1942, §§ 7683, 7699; Laws, 1938, chs. 139, 142; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 389, § 23; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 530, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1990]

§ 77-1-47.
Appeal bonds; supersedeas bonds [Repealed effective December 31, 2020].

Appeals from any final finding, order or judgment of the commission shall be taken and perfected by the filing of a bond in the sum of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) with two (2) sureties, or with a surety company qualified to do business in Mississippi as the surety, conditioned to pay the cost of such appeal. Said bond shall be approved by the chairman or secretary of the commission, or by the judge of the court to which such appeal is taken in case the chairman or secretary of the commission refuses to approve a proper bond tendered to them within the time limited for taking appeals. The commission may grant a supersedeas bond on any appeal, in such penalty and with such surety thereon as it may deem sufficient, and may, during the pendency of any appeal, at any time, require the increase of any such supersedeas bond or additional securities thereon. The judge of the Circuit Court of Hinds County may on petition therefor by any party entitled to an appeal, presented to him within six (6) months of the date of the final finding, order, or judgment of the commission appealed from, award a writ of supersedeas to any such final finding, order, or judgment of the commission, upon the filing of a supersedeas bond in an amount to be fixed by said judge. All appeal bonds for the payment of costs, and all supersedeas bonds, shall be made payable to the state and may be enforced in the name of the state by motion or other legal proceedings or remedy in any circuit court of this state having jurisdiction of a motion or action on such bond, and the process and proceedings thereon shall be as provided by law upon bonds of like character required and taken by any court of this state. Such circuit court may render and enter like judgments upon such bonds as may, by law, be rendered and entered upon bonds of like character, and process of execution shall issue upon such judgments, and may be levied and executed as provided by law in other cases.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7684, 7700; Laws, 1938, chs. 139, 142; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 389, § 24; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 530, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 1993, ch. 616, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 1996, ch. 526, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 303, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 452, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 386, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, ch. 406, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 456, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 542, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 332, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 437, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2016; reenacted without change, Laws, 2018, ch. 402, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 77-1-49.
Annual reports of the commission [Repealed effective December 31, 2020].

The commission shall make a report every year to the Legislature of all its acts and doings for the preceding fiscal year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4333; 1906, § 4887; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7674; 1930, § 7041; 1942, § 7818; Laws, 1908, ch. 84; Laws, 1970, ch. 523, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 389, § 25; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 530, § 23; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1993, ch. 616, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 1996, ch. 526, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 303, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 452, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 386, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, ch. 406, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 456, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 542, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 332, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 437, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2016; reenacted without change, Laws, 2018, ch. 402, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 77-1-51.
Repeal of §§ 77-1-1 through 77-1-49.

Sections 77-1-1 through 77-1-49, Mississippi Code of 1972, which create the Public Service Commission and prescribe its powers and duties, shall stand repealed as of December 31, 2020.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 301, § 53; Laws, 1982, ch. 389, § 26; Laws, 1990, ch. 530, § 24; Laws, 1993, ch. 616, § 21; Laws, 2002, ch. 452, § 22; Laws, 2006, ch. 386, § 22; Laws, 2008, ch. 406, § 22; Laws, 2011, ch. 456, § 22; Laws, 2012, ch. 542, § 22; Laws, 2013, ch. 332, § 22; Laws, 2016, ch. 437, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 402, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 77-1-53.
Institution and conduct of proceedings for enforcement of statutes administered by commission or regulations or orders of commission; penalties; appeals; funding of agency expenses; deposit of monies into State General Fund.

Whenever the commission, an employee of the commission or any employee of the public utilities staff has reason to believe that a willful and knowing violation of any statute administered by the commission or any regulation or any order of the commission has occurred, the commission may cause a written complaint to be served upon the alleged violator or violators. The complaint shall specify the provisions of such statute, regulation or order alleged to be violated and the facts alleged to constitute a violation thereof and shall require that the alleged violator appear before the commission at a time and place specified in the notice and answer the charges complained of. The time of appearance before the commission shall not be less than twenty (20) days from the date of the service of the complaint, unless the commission finds that the public convenience or necessity requires that such hearing be held at an earlier date.

The commission shall afford an opportunity for a fair hearing to the alleged violator or violators at the time and place specified in the complaint. On the basis of the evidence produced at the hearing, the commission shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law and enter its order, which in its opinion will be in the best interests of the consuming public. Failure to appear at any such hearing, without prior authorization to do so from the commission, may result in the commission finding the alleged violator guilty of the charges complained of by default, and at such time an order may be entered, including the assessment of a penalty. The commission shall give written notice of such order to the alleged violator and to such other persons as shall have appeared at the hearing or made written request for notice of the order. The commission may assess such penalties as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

Any person found by the commission, pursuant to a hearing or by default as provided in this section, violating any statute administered by the commission, or any regulation or order of the commission in pursuance thereof, shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for each violation, to be assessed and collected by the commission. Each day that a violation continues shall constitute a separate violation. In lieu of, or in addition to, the monetary penalty, the commission, for any violation by a certificate holder, may impose a penalty in accordance with Section 77-3-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, if it finds that the violator is not rendering reasonably adequate service. Appeals from the imposition of the civil penalty may be taken to the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County in the same manner as appeals from orders of the commission constituting judicial findings.

All penalties collected by the commission under this section shall be deposited in the Public Service Commission Regulation Fund.

No portion of any penalty or costs associated with an administrative or court proceeding which results in the assessment of a penalty against a public utility for violation of any statute administered by the commission, or any regulation or order of the commission shall be considered by the commission in fixing any rates or charges of such public utility.

This section shall be in addition to any other law which provides for the imposition of penalties for the violation of any statute administered by the commission or any regulation or order of the commission.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 562 § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 52, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 77-1-55.
Commission authorized to hire attorneys or consultants to monitor, investigate and seek relief from existing or proposed interstate rates, charges, etc. [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

The Public Service Commission, with the aid and the assistance of the Public Utilities Staff, shall have the power to monitor, investigate, and seek relief in any appropriate federal forum from all existing or proposed interstate rates, charges, allocations and classifications, and all rules and practices in relation thereto promulgated and prescribed by or for any public utility as defined in Section 77-3-3(d)(i).

The Public Service Commission, with the aid and the assistance of the Public Utilities Staff, may seek relief from any proposed or final decision, order, regulation, rule or law that has an impact on any existing or proposed interstate rate, charge, allocation or classification.

For the purpose of this section, the Public Service Commission and the Executive Director of the Public Utilities Staff may each enter into professional services contracts with one or more attorneys or consultants from a competent, qualified and independent firm as may be required by the commission or the executive director. Costs associated with the professional service contracts shall not exceed One Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00) for each agency with respect to each rate regulated affected utility in any twelve-month period. The consultants or counsel shall submit periodically, but no less frequently than once each calendar quarter, to the executive director or the commission, as applicable, for approval of payment, itemized bills detailing the work performed. The executive director or the chairman of the commission, as applicable, shall requisition the applicable public utility to make the requisite payments to such consultants. The commission shall allow the utility to recover both the total costs the utility incurred under this section and the carrying charges for those costs through a rate rider established to recover the costs incurred and carrying charges incurred. Such rider shall include a true-up provision to ensure actual recovery of costs paid or otherwise incurred by the utility.

This section shall stand repealed from and after July 1, 2020.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 527, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 332, § 23; Laws, 2016, ch. 437, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 402, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 2018.